Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202647-1118
Reentry Housing Fund; created; use; investment; reentry housing facility; fee.

(1) The Reentry Housing Fund is created. The fund shall be maintained in the state accounting system as a cash fund and shall consist of all fees, grants, federal funds, and other money received by the department under the Community Work Release and Reentry Centers Act. The department shall use the fund to carry out the act.

(2) Any money in the Reentry Housing Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

(3) The department may assess an annual fee on each reentry housing facility for the purposes of carrying out the Community Work Release and Reentry Centers Act. Such annual fee shall not exceed one thousand dollars. The department shall remit any such fees collected to the State Treasurer for credit to the Reentry Housing Fund.

Laws 2024, LB631, § 18.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.